Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-939
Retirement system; benefits; paid by retirement board.

All benefits under the retirement system shall be paid as directed by the retirement board. Except as provided in section 79-916, no member shall receive a retirement benefit from the retirement system covering years for which he or she is being paid a benefit under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 1967, c. 546, § 18, p. 1809;

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 90, p. 2401;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1557;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 574;

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 24;

Laws 1998, LB 497, § 1.

Class V School Employees Retirement Act, see section 79-978.01.